District of Columbia statutes.
38-805

Equipment appropriations.

Appropriations are authorized for the payment of compensation for all personal services necessary for the operation of the Department of Food Services and for the acquisition, maintenance, and replacement of equipment for use in that operation.

Oct. 8, 1951, 65 Stat. 369, ch. 448, title I, § 6
Sept. 2, 1958, 72 Stat. 1735, Pub. L. 85-901, § 1
Oct. 25, 1968, 82 Stat. 1363, Pub. L. 90-640,§ 3
1981 Ed., § 31-805.
1973 Ed., § 31-1405.